Washington statutes.
RCW 2.56.140

Disposition of school attendance violation petitions—Report.

The administrator for the courts shall prepare a report for each school year to be submitted to the legislature no later than December 15th of each year that summarizes the disposition of petitions filed with the juvenile court under RCW 28A.225.030, including the number of contempt orders issued to enforce a court's order under RCW 28A.225.030.

[ 1996 c 134 s 8.]